District of Columbia statutes.
42-1902.15

Preliminary recordation of plans.

Plans previously recorded pursuant to the provisos set forth in subsections (b) and (c) of § 42-1902.10 may be used in lieu of new plans to satisfy in whole or in part the requirements of §§ 42-1902.12(b), 42-1902.17(b) and 42-1902.19 if certifications thereof are recorded by the declarant in accordance with § 42-1902.14(b); and if such certifications are so recorded, the plans which they certify shall be deemed recorded pursuant to § 42-1902.14(c) within the meaning of the 3 sections aforesaid.

History

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title II, § 215, 23 DCR 9532b

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-1902.14.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1825.
1973 Ed., § 5-1225.